California statutes. Vehicle Code
(e) If any personal check is offered in payment of fines described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and is returned for any reason, the related notice issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5 shall be restored to the person’s record.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any license that has been suspended pursuant to this section shall immediately be reinstated, and the fees and penalties waived, upon the submission of proof acceptable to the department that the check has been erroneously dishonored by the bank or financial institution.

(g) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 14.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.   See later operative version added by Sec. 15 of Stats. 2022, Ch. 800.)
-------------------------------------------

13364.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle shall be suspended upon notification by a bank or financial institution that a check has been dishonored when that check was presented to the department for either of the following reasons:

(1) In payment of a fine that resulted from an outstanding violation pursuant to Section 40508 or a suspension pursuant to former Section 13365.

(2) In payment of a fee or penalty owed by the person, if the fee or penalty is required by this code for the issuance, reissuance, or return of the person’s driver’s license
 after suspension, revocation, or restriction of the driving privilege.

(b) The suspension shall remain in effect until payment of all fines, fees, and penalties is made to the department or to the court, as appropriate, and the person’s driving record does not contain any notification of a court order issued pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 42003 or of a violation of subdivision (a) or (b) of Section 40508.

(c) No suspension imposed pursuant to this section shall become effective until 30 days after the mailing of a written notice of the intent to suspend.

(d) The written notice of a suspension imposed pursuant to this section shall be delivered by certified mail.

(e) If any personal check is offered in payment of fines described in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) and is returned for any reason, the related notice issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5 shall be restored to the person’s record.

(f) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any license that has been suspended pursuant to this section shall immediately be reinstated, and the fees and penalties waived, upon the submission of proof acceptable to the department that the check has been erroneously dishonored by the bank or financial institution.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2027.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 14) and added by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 15.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Operative January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13365.

(a) Upon receipt of notification of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 40508, the department shall take the following action:

(1) If the notice is given pursuant to subdivision (a) of former Section 40509, if the driving record of the person who is the subject of the notice contains one or more prior notifications of a violation issued pursuant to former Section 40509 or former Section 40509.5, and if
 the person’s driving privilege is not currently suspended under this section, the department shall suspend the driving privilege of the person.

(2) If the notice is given pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 40509.5, and if the driving privilege of the person who is the subject of the notice is not currently suspended under this section, the department shall suspend the driving privilege of the person.

(b) (1) A suspension under this section shall not be effective before a date 60 days after the date of receipt, by the department, of the notice given specified in subdivision (a), and the notice of suspension shall not be mailed by the department before a date 30 days after receipt of the notice given specified in subdivision (a).

(2) The suspension shall continue until the suspended person’s driving record does not contain any notification of a violation of subdivision (a) of Section 40508.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 16.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13365.2.

(a) Upon receipt of the notice required under subdivision (b) of former Section 40509.5, the department shall suspend the driving privilege of the person upon whom notice was received and shall continue that suspension until receipt of the certificate required under that subdivision.

(b) The suspension required under subdivision (a) shall become effective on the 45th day after the mailing of written notice by the department.

(c) This section shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2027, and as of that date is
 repealed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 800, Sec. 17.   (AB 2746)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2027, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13365.5.

(a) Upon receipt of a notification issued pursuant to Section 40509.1, the department shall suspend the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle until compliance with the court order is shown or as prescribed in subdivision (c) of Section 12808. The suspension under this section shall not be effective until 45 days after the giving of written notice by the department.

(b) This section does not apply to a notification of failure to comply with a court order issued for a violation enumerated in paragraph (1), (2), (3), (6), or (7) of subdivision (b) of Section 1803.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 158, Sec. 21.7.   Effective July 21, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

13366.

Whenever in this code the department is required to suspend or revoke the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle upon the conviction of such person of violating this code, such suspension or revocation shall begin upon a plea, finding or verdict of guilty.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13366.5.

(a) Notwithstanding Section 13366, whenever in this code the department is required to disqualify the commercial driving privilege of a person to operate a commercial motor vehicle upon the conviction of that person of a violation of this code, the suspension or revocation shall begin upon receipt by the department of a duly certified abstract of any court record showing that the person has been so convicted.

(b) This section shall become operative on September 20, 2005.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 952, Sec. 11.   Effective January 1, 2005.   Section operative September 20, 2005, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13367.

For purposes of the suspension or revocation of any driver’s license issued to a minor, the department shall not provide any lighter penalty than would be given to an adult under similar circumstances.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 562.)
-------------------------------------------

13368.

The department, as a condition to the reinstatement of a suspended license or the issuance of a new license to an individual whose prior license has been revoked, may require the individual to attend the program authorized by the provisions of Section 1659.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

13369.

(a) This section applies to the following endorsements and certificates:

(1) Passenger transportation vehicle.

(2) Hazardous materials.

(3) Schoolbus.

(4) School pupil activity bus.

(5) Youth bus.

(6) General public paratransit vehicle.

(7) Farm labor vehicle.

(8) Vehicle used
 for the transportation of developmentally disabled persons.

(b) The department shall refuse to issue or renew, or shall revoke, the certificate or endorsement of a person who meets the following conditions:

(1) Within three years, has committed any violation that results in a conviction assigned a violation point count of two or more, as defined in Sections 12810 and 12810.5. The department shall not refuse to issue or renew, nor may it revoke, a person’s hazardous materials or passenger transportation vehicle endorsement if the violation leading to the conviction occurred in the person’s private vehicle and not in a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in Section 15210.

(2) Within three years, has had his or her driving privilege suspended, revoked, or on probation for any reason involving unsafe operation of a
 motor vehicle. The department shall not refuse to issue or renew, nor may it revoke, a person’s passenger transportation vehicle endorsement if the person’s driving privilege has, within three years, been placed on probation only for a reason involving unsafe operation of a motor vehicle.

(3) Notwithstanding paragraphs (1) and (2), does not meet the qualifications for issuance of a hazardous materials endorsement set forth in Parts 383, 384, and 1572 of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations.

(c) The department may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke, the certificate or endorsement of a person who meets any of the following conditions:

(1) Within 12 months, has been involved as a driver in three accidents in which the driver caused or contributed to the causes of the accidents.

(2) Within 24 months, as a driver, caused or contributed to the cause of an accident resulting in a fatality or serious injury or serious property damage in excess of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(3) Has violated any provision of this code, or any rule or regulation pertaining to the safe operation of a vehicle for which the certificate or endorsement was issued.

(4) Has violated any restriction of the certificate, endorsement, or commercial driver’s license.

(5) Has knowingly made a false statement or failed to disclose a material fact on an application for a certificate or endorsement.

(6) Has been determined by the department to be a negligent or incompetent operator.

(7) Has demonstrated irrational behavior to the extent that a reasonable and prudent person would have reasonable cause to believe that the applicant’s ability to perform the duties of a driver may be impaired.

(8) Excessively or habitually uses, or is addicted to, alcoholic beverages, narcotics, or dangerous drugs.

(9) Does not meet the minimum medical standards established or approved by the department.

(d) The department may cancel the certificate or endorsement of any driver who meets any of the following conditions:

(1) Does not have a valid driver’s license of the appropriate class.

(2) Has requested cancellation of the
 certificate or endorsement.

(3) Has failed to meet any of the requirements for issuance or retention of the certificate or endorsement, including, but not limited to, payment of the proper fee, submission of an acceptable medical report and fingerprint cards, and compliance with prescribed training requirements.

(4) Has had his or her driving privilege suspended or revoked for a cause involving other than the safe operation of a motor vehicle.

(e) (1) The department shall refuse to issue or renew, or shall suspend or revoke, the passenger vehicle endorsement of a person who violates subdivision (b) of Section 5387 of the Public Utilities Code.

(2) A person found to be in violation of subdivision (b) of Section 5387 of the Public
 Utilities Code shall be ineligible for a passenger vehicle endorsement that would permit him or her to drive a bus of any kind, including, but not limited to, a bus, schoolbus, youth bus, school pupil activity bus, trailer bus, or a transit bus, with passengers, for a period of five years.

(f) (1) Reapplication following refusal or revocation under subdivision (b) or (c) may be made after a period of not less than one year from the effective date of denial or revocation, except in cases where a longer period of suspension or revocation is required by law.

(2) Reapplication following cancellation under subdivision (d) may be made at any time without prejudice.

(g) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2017.

(History: Repealed (in Sec. 25) and added by Stats. 2015, Ch. 451, Sec. 26.   (SB 491)   Effective January 1, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2017, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

13370.

(a) The department shall refuse to issue or shall revoke a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, general public paratransit vehicle, or youth bus driver certificate, or a certificate for a vehicle used for the transportation of developmentally disabled persons, if any of the following causes apply to the applicant or certificate holder:

(1) Has been convicted of a sex offense as defined in Section 44010 of the Education Code.

(2) Has been convicted, within two years, of an offense specified in Section 11361.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(3) Has failed to meet prescribed training requirements for
 certificate issuance.

(4) Has failed to meet prescribed testing requirements for certificate issuance.

(5) Has been convicted of a violent felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5 of the Penal Code, or a serious felony listed in subdivision (c) of Section 1192.7 of the Penal Code. This paragraph shall not be applied to revoke a license that was valid on January 1, 2005, unless the certificate holder is convicted for an offense that is committed on or after that date.

(b) The department may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, general public paratransit vehicle, or youth bus driver certificate, or a certificate for a vehicle used for the
 transportation of developmentally disabled persons, if any of the following causes apply to the applicant or certificate holder:

(1) Has been convicted of a crime specified in Section 44424 of the Education Code within seven years. This paragraph does not apply if denial is mandatory.

(2) Has committed an act involving moral turpitude.

(3) Has been convicted of an offense, not specified in this section and other than a sex offense, that is punishable as a felony, within seven years.

(4) Has been dismissed as a driver for a cause relating to pupil transportation safety.

(5) Has been convicted,
 within seven years, of an offense relating to the use, sale, possession, or transportation of narcotics, habit-forming drugs, or dangerous drugs, except as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (a).

(6) Has been reported to the Department of Motor Vehicles, pursuant to Section 39843 of the Education Code, for leaving a pupil unattended on a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, or youth bus.

(c) (1) Reapplication following refusal or revocation under paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (a) or any paragraph of subdivision (b) may be made after a period of not less than one year after the effective date of refusal or revocation.

(2) Reapplication following refusal or revocation under paragraph
 (4) of subdivision (a) may be made after a period of not less than 45 days after the date of the applicant’s third testing failure.

(3) An applicant or holder of a certificate may reapply for a certificate whenever a felony or misdemeanor conviction is reversed or dismissed. A termination of probation and dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code or a dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4a of the Penal Code is not a dismissal for purposes of this section.

(4) A former applicant or holder of a certificate whose certificate was revoked pursuant to paragraph (6) of subdivision (b) may reapply for a certificate if the certificate revocation is reversed or dismissed by the department.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 721, Sec. 6.   (SB 1072)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

13371.

This section applies to schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, general public paratransit vehicle certificates, and a certificate for a vehicle used for the transportation of developmentally disabled persons.

(a) Any driver or applicant who has received a notice of refusal, suspension, or revocation, may, within 15 days after the mailing date, submit to the department a written request for a hearing. Failure to demand a hearing within 15 days is a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(1) Upon receipt by the department of the hearing request, the department may stay the action until a hearing is conducted and the final decision has been rendered by the Certificate Action Review Board pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision (d). The department shall not stay an action when there is reasonable cause to believe the stay would pose a significant risk to the safety of pupils being transported in a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, or persons being transported in a general public paratransit vehicle.

(2) An applicant or driver is not entitled to a hearing whenever the action by the department is made mandatory by this article or any other applicable law or regulation except where the cause for refusal is based on failure to meet medical standards or excessive and habitual use of or addiction to alcoholic beverages, narcotics, or dangerous drugs.

(b) The department shall appoint a hearing officer to conduct the hearing in accordance with Section 14112. After the hearing, the hearing officer shall prepare and submit findings and recommendations to the department.

(c) The department shall mail, as specified in Section 22, a copy of the hearing officer’s findings and recommendations to the driver or applicant and to the driver or applicant’s hearing representative, either of whom may file a statement of exception to the findings and recommendations within 24 days after the mailing date.

(d) (1) The Certificate Action Review Board consists of the following three members: a chairperson appointed by the director of the department, a member appointed by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol, and a member appointed by the Superintendent of Public Instruction.

(2) After a hearing, the board shall review the findings and recommendations of the hearing officer, and any statement of exception, and make a decision concerning disposition of the action taken by the department, which decision shall be final. At this stage, no evidence shall be heard that was not presented at the hearing, unless the person wishing to present the new evidence establishes, to the satisfaction of the board, that it could not have been obtained with due diligence prior to the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13372.

(a) The department shall refuse to issue or renew, or shall suspend or revoke an ambulance driver certificate if any of the following apply to the applicant or certificate holder:

(1) Is required to register as a sex offender under Section 290 of the Penal Code for any offense involving force, violence, threat, or intimidation.

(2) Habitually or excessively uses or is addicted to narcotics or dangerous drugs.

(3) Is on parole or probation for any felony, theft, or any crime involving force, violence, threat, or intimidation.

(b) The department may refuse to issue or renew, or may suspend or revoke an ambulance driver certificate if any of the following apply to the applicant or certificate holder:

(1) Has been convicted within seven years of any offense punishable as a felony or has been convicted during that period of any theft.

(2) Has committed any act involving moral turpitude, including fraud or intentional dishonesty for personal gain, within seven years.

(3) Habitually and excessively uses intoxicating beverages.

(4) Has been convicted within seven years of any offense relating to the use, sale, possession, or transportation of narcotics or addictive or dangerous drugs, or of any misdemeanor involving force, violence, threat, or intimidation.

(5) Is on probation to the department for a cause involving the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle.

(6) Within three years has had his or her driver’s license suspended or revoked by the department for a cause involving the unsafe operation of a motor vehicle, or, within the same period, has been convicted of any of the following:

(A) Failing to stop and render aid in an accident involving injury or death.

(B) Driving-under-the-influence of intoxicating liquor, any drug, or under the combined influence of intoxicating liquor and any drug.

(C) Reckless driving, or reckless driving involving bodily injury.

(7) Has knowingly made a false statement or failed to disclose a material fact in his or her application.

(8) Has been involved as a driver in any motor vehicle accident causing death or bodily injury or in three or more motor vehicle accidents within one year.

(9) Does not meet minimum medical standards specified in this code or in regulations adopted pursuant to this code.

(10) Has demonstrated irrational behavior or incurred a physical disability to the extent that a reasonable and prudent person would have reasonable cause to believe that the ability to perform the duties normally expected of an ambulance driver may be impaired.

(11) Has violated any provision of this code or any rule or regulation adopted by the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol relating to the operation of emergency ambulances within one year.

(12) Has committed any act that warrants dismissal, as provided in Section 13373.

(c) (1) Reapplication following refusal or revocation under subdivision (a) or (b) may be made after a period of not less than one year after the effective date of the refusal or revocation, except in cases where a longer period of refusal, suspension, or revocation is required by law.

(2) Reapplication following refusal or revocation under subdivision (a) or (b) may be made if a felony or misdemeanor conviction supporting the refusal or revocation is reversed or dismissed. A termination of probation and dismissal of charges under Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code or a dismissal of charges under Section 1203.4a of the Penal Code is not a dismissal for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13373.

The receipt of satisfactory evidence of any violation of Article 1 (commencing with Section 1100) of Subchapter 5 of Chapter 2 of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, the Vehicle Code, or any other applicable law that would provide grounds for refusal, suspension, or revocation of an ambulance driver’s certificate or evidence of an act committed involving intentional dishonesty for personal gain or conduct contrary to justice, honesty, modesty, or good morals, may be sufficient cause for the dismissal of any ambulance driver or attendant. Dismissal of a driver or attendant under this section shall be reported by the employer to the Department of Motor Vehicles at Sacramento within 10 days.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13374.

(a) An applicant for, or the holder of, an ambulance driver certificate who has received a notice of refusal, suspension, or revocation may submit, within 15 days after the notice has been mailed by the department, a written request for a hearing. Upon receipt of the request, the department shall appoint a referee who shall conduct an informal hearing in accordance with Section 14104. Failure to request a hearing within 15 days after the notice has been mailed by the department is a waiver of the right to a hearing. A request for a hearing shall not operate to stay the action for which notice is given.

(b) Upon conclusion of an informal hearing, the referee shall prepare and submit findings and recommendations through the department to a committee of three members one each appointed by the Director of the Emergency Medical Service Authority, the director, and the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol with the appointee of the Commissioner of the California Highway Patrol serving as chairperson. After a review of the findings and recommendations, the committee shall render a final decision on the action taken, and the department shall notify the person involved of the decision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13375.

For the purposes of this article, any plea or verdict of guilty, plea of nolo contendere, or court finding of guilt in a trial without a jury, or forfeiture of bail, is deemed a conviction, notwithstanding subsequent action under Section 1203.4 or 1203.4a of the Penal Code allowing withdrawal of the plea of guilty and entering a plea of not guilty, setting aside the verdict of guilty, or dismissing the accusation or information.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 41.)
-------------------------------------------

13376.

(a) This section applies to the following certificates:

(1) Schoolbus.

(2) School pupil activity bus.

(3) Youth bus.

(4) General public paratransit vehicle.

(5) Vehicle used for the transportation of developmentally disabled persons.

(b) (1) The department shall revoke a certificate listed in subdivision (a) for three years if the certificate holder refuses to submit to a test for, fails to comply with the testing requirements for, or receives a positive test for a controlled substance, as specified in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 34520. However, the department shall not revoke a certificate under this paragraph if the certificate holder is in compliance with any rehabilitation or return to duty program that is imposed by the employer that meets the controlled substances and alcohol use and testing requirements set forth in Part 382 (commencing with Section 382.101) of Title 49 of the Code of Federal Regulations. The driver shall be allowed to participate in a rehabilitation or return to duty program only once within a three-year period. The employer or program shall report any subsequent positive test result or drop from the program to the department on a form approved by the department.

(2) If an applicant refuses to submit to a test for, fails to comply with the testing requirements for, or receives a positive test for a controlled substance, the department shall refuse the application for a certificate listed in subdivision (a) for three years from the date of the confirmed positive test result.

(3) The carrier that requested the test shall report the refusal, failure to comply, or positive test result to the department not later than five days after receiving notification of the test result on a form approved by the department.

(4) The department shall maintain a record of any action taken for a refusal, failure to comply, or positive test result in the driving record of the applicant or certificate holder for three years from the date of the refusal, failure to comply, or positive test result.

(c) (1) The department may temporarily suspend a schoolbus, school pupil activity bus, youth bus, or general public paratransit driver certificate, or temporarily withhold issuance of a certificate to an applicant, if the holder or applicant is arrested for or charged with any sex offense, as defined in Section 44010 of the Education Code.

(2) Upon receipt of a notice of temporary suspension, or of the department’s intent to withhold issuance, of a certificate, the certificate holder or applicant may request a hearing within 10 days of the effective date of the department’s action.

(3) The department shall, upon request of the holder of, or applicant for, a certificate, within 10 working days of the receipt of the request, conduct a hearing on whether the public interest requires suspension or withholding of the certificate pursuant to paragraph (1).

(4) If the charge is dismissed or results in a finding of not guilty, the department shall immediately terminate the suspension or resume the application process, and shall expunge the suspension action taken pursuant to this subdivision from the record of the applicant or certificate holder.

(d) An applicant or holder of a certificate may reapply for a certificate whenever a felony or misdemeanor conviction is reversed or dismissed. A termination of probation and dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code or a dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4a of the Penal Code is not a dismissal for purposes of this section.

(e) The determination of the facts pursuant to this section is a civil matter which is independent of the determination of the person’s guilt or innocence, has no collateral estoppel effect on a subsequent criminal prosecution, and does not preclude the litigation of the same or similar facts in a criminal proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 7.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13377.

(a) The department shall not issue or renew, or shall revoke, the tow truck driver certificate of an applicant or holder for any of the following causes:

(1) The tow truck driver certificate applicant or holder has been convicted of a violation of Section 220 of the Penal Code.

(2) The tow truck driver certificate applicant or holder has been convicted of a violation of paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a) of Section 261 of the Penal Code.

(3) The tow truck driver certificate applicant or holder has been convicted of a violation of Section 264.1, 267, 288, or 289 of the Penal Code.

(4) The tow truck driver certificate applicant or holder has been convicted of any felony or three misdemeanors as set forth in subparagraph (B) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (a) of Section 5164 of the Public Resources Code.

(5) The tow truck driver certificate applicant’s or holder’s driving privilege has been suspended or revoked in accordance with any provisions of this code. 

(b) For purposes of this section, a conviction means a plea or verdict of guilty or a conviction following a plea of nolo contendere. For purposes of this section, the record of a conviction, or a copy thereof certified by the clerk of the court or by a judge of the court in which the conviction occurred, is conclusive evidence of the conviction. 

(c) Whenever the department receives information from the Department of Justice, or the Federal Bureau of Investigation, that a tow truck driver has been convicted of an offense specified in paragraph (1), (2), (3), or (4) of subdivision (a), the department shall immediately notify the employer and the Department of the California Highway Patrol. 

(d) An applicant or holder of a tow truck driver certificate, whose certificate was denied or revoked, may reapply for a certificate whenever the applicable felony or misdemeanor conviction is reversed or dismissed. If the cause for the denial or revocation was based on the suspension or revocation of the applicant’s or holder’s driving privilege, he or she may reapply for a certificate upon restoration of his or her driving privilege. A termination of probation and dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4 of the Penal Code or a dismissal of charges pursuant to Section 1203.4a of the Penal Code is not a dismissal for purposes of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 184, Sec. 6.   Effective July 23, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

13378.

(a) Any applicant for, or holder of, a tow truck driver certificate who has received a notice of refusal or revocation, may submit to the department, within 15 days after the mailing of the notice, a written request for a hearing. Failure to request a hearing, in writing, within 15 days is a waiver of the right to a hearing.

(b) Upon receipt by the department of the hearing request, the department may stay the action until a hearing is conducted and the final decision is made by the hearing officer. The department shall not stay the action when there is reasonable cause to believe that the stay would pose a threat to a member of the motoring public who may require the services of the tow truck driver in question.

(c) An applicant for, or a holder of, a tow truck driver certificate, whose certificate has been refused or revoked, is not entitled to a hearing whenever the action by the department is made mandatory by this article or any other applicable law or regulation.

(d) Upon receipt of a request for a hearing, and when the requesting party is entitled to a hearing under this article, the department shall appoint a hearing officer to conduct a hearing in accordance with Section 14112.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 66, Sec. 8.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------

13380.

(a) If a peace officer serves a notice of an order of suspension pursuant to Section 13388, or arrests any person for a violation of Section 23140, 23152, or 23153, the peace officer shall immediately forward to the department a sworn report of all information relevant to the enforcement action, including information that adequately identifies the person, a statement of the officer’s grounds for belief that the person violated Section 23136, 23140, 23152, or 23153, a report of the results of any chemical tests that were conducted on the person or the circumstances constituting a refusal to submit to or complete the chemical testing pursuant to Section 13388 or 23612, a copy of any notice to appear under which the person was released from custody, and, if immediately available, a copy of the complaint filed with the court. For the purposes of this section and subdivision (g) of Section 23612, “immediately” means on or before the end of the fifth ordinary business day following the arrest, except that with respect to Section 13388 only, “immediately” has the same meaning as that term is defined in paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 13388.

(b) The peace officer’s sworn report shall be made on forms furnished or approved by the department.

(c) For the purposes of this section, a report prepared pursuant to subdivision (a) and received pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1801, is a sworn report when it bears an entry identifying the maker of the document or a signature that has been affixed by means of an electronic device approved by the department.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 3.24.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13382.

(a) If the chemical test results for a person who has been arrested for a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 show that the person has 0.08 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood, or if the chemical test results for a person who has been arrested for a violation of Section 23140 show that the person has 0.05 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in the person’s blood, the peace officer, acting on behalf of the department, shall serve a notice of order of suspension or revocation of the person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle personally on the arrested person.

(b) If the peace officer serves the notice of order of suspension or revocation, the peace officer shall take possession of any driver’s license issued by this state which is held by the person. When the officer takes possession of a valid driver’s license, the officer shall issue, on behalf of the department, a temporary driver’s license. The temporary driver’s license shall be an endorsement on the notice of the order of suspension or revocation and shall be valid for 30 days from the date of arrest.

(c) The peace officer shall immediately forward a copy of the completed notice of order of suspension form, and any driver’s license taken into possession under subdivision (b), with the report required by Section 13380, to the department. For the purposes of this section, “immediately” means on or before the end of the fifth ordinary business day following the arrest.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13384.

(a) The department shall not issue or renew a driver’s license to any person unless the person consents in writing to submit to a chemical test or tests of that person’s blood, breath, or urine pursuant to Section 23612, or a preliminary alcohol screening test pursuant to Section 23136, when requested to do so by a peace officer.

(b) All application forms for driver’s licenses or driver’s license renewal notices shall include a requirement that the applicant sign the following declaration as a condition of licensure:

“I agree to submit to a chemical test of my blood, breath, or urine for the purpose of determining the alcohol or drug content of my blood when testing is requested by a peace officer acting in accordance with Section 13388 or 23612 of the Vehicle Code.”

(c) The department is not, incident to this section, required to maintain, copy, or store any information other than that to be incorporated into the standard application form.

(History: Added by Stats. 1998, Ch. 118, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1999.   Operative July 1, 1999, by Sec. 85 of Ch. 118.)
-------------------------------------------

13385.

(a) On or after July 1, 2008, all application forms for driver’s licenses or driver’s license renewal notices shall include a requirement that the applicant sign the following declaration as a condition of licensure:

“I am hereby advised that being under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or both, impairs the ability to safely operate a motor vehicle. Therefore, it is extremely dangerous to human life to drive while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or both. If I drive while under the influence of alcohol or drugs, or both, and as a result, a person is killed, I can be charged with murder.”

(b) On all application forms for driver’s licenses or driver’s license renewal notices printed by the department, in English or a language other than English, the department shall include the declaration in the same language as the application or renewal notice.

(c) The department is not, incident to this section, required to maintain, copy, or store any information other than that to be incorporated into the standard application form.

(History: Added by Stats. 2007, Ch. 748, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

13386.

(a) (1) The department shall certify or cause to be certified ignition interlock devices required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 23575) of Chapter 2 of Division 11.5 and publish a list of approved devices.

(2) (A) The department shall ensure that ignition interlock devices that have been certified according to the requirements of this section continue to meet certification requirements. The department may periodically require manufacturers to indicate in writing whether the devices continue to meet certification requirements.

(B) The department may use denial of certification, suspension or revocation of certification, or decertification of an ignition